Louisiana, session 2026, SB313.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Art. 14.1(D) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 14.1. Electronic filings
* * *
D. Except as provided in R.S. 13:847, no additional fees shall be charged
by the clerk of court's e-filing vendor for electronic filings in criminal and
traffic actions, to either the clerk or the filer, including service fees related to
electronic filings.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-560 REENGROSSED
SB NO. 313